District of Columbia statutes.
1-811.04

Determination of methodology for making payments.

(a)

Notice to President and Congress. —

Not later than 18 months before the time that assets remaining in the Trust Fund are projected to be insufficient for making Federal benefit payments and covering necessary administrative expenses when due, the Secretary shall so advise the President and the Congress.

(b)

Selection of methodology. —

Before all available assets of the Trust Fund have been depleted, the Secretary shall determine whether Federal benefit payments and necessary administrative expenses under this chapter shall be made by one of the following methods:

(1)

Continuation of the Trust Fund using payments from the Federal Supplemental Fund.

(2)

Discontinuation of the Trust Fund, with payments made:

(A)

By direct payment by the Secretary from the Federal Supplemental Fund; or

(B)

From the Federal Supplemental Fund through another department or agency of the United States.

(c)

Arrangements by Secretary. —

The Secretary shall make appropriate arrangements to implement the determinations made in this section.

Aug. 5, 1997, 111 Stat. 727, Pub. L. 105-33, § 11054
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-264, § 6(a), 46 DCR 2118
This section is referenced in § 1-811.02 and § 1-811.05.
1981 Ed., § 1-766.4.